Illinois, session 104th, HB2325.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Uniform Commercial Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-101 as follows: 6    (810 ILCS 5/1-101)  (from Ch. 26, par. 1-101)7    Sec. 1-101. Short Titles. 8    (a) This Act may be cited as the the Uniform Commercial 9Code.10    (b) This Article may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code - 11General Provisions. 12(Source: P.A. 95-895, eff. 1-1-09.)